liblouis/files/fr-bfu-g2.ctb
word caractère		14-2346
word caractères		14-2346-234
word caractéristique	14-123456-12345
word caractéristiques	14-123456-12345-234
word ceci		14-14
word cela		14-1
contraction ca	14-1
word celle		14-123
word celles		14-123-234
word celui-ci		36-36-14-24
word celui-là		36-36-123-12356
word cependant		14-1234
contraction cp	14-1234
word certain		14-35
word certains		14-35-234
prfword certaine		14-1345
prfword certaines		14-1345-234
prfword certainement	14-1345-134
word certes		14-236
prfword certitude		14-236-145
prfword certitudes		14-236-145-234
word ces		14-234
word cette		14-2345
word ceux		14-1346
contraction cx	14-1346
word chacun		12356-14
word chacune		12356-1345
word chagrin		12356-12456
word chagrins		12356-12456-234
word chaleur		12356-123
word chaleurs		12356-123-234
word chaleureuse	12356-123-234-15
word chaleureuses	12356-123-234-156
word chaleureusement	12356-123-234-134
word chaleureux		12356-123-1346
word champ		12356-1234
word champs		12356-1234-234
prfword change		12356-1245
prfword changes		12356-1245-234
word changement		12356-1245-134
prfword changeur		12356-1245-46
prfword changeurs		12356-1245-46-234
prfword changeuse		12356-1245-234-15
prfword changeuses		12356-1245-234-156
word chaque		12356-12345
word charitable		12356-2345-45
word charitables		12356-2345-45-234
word charitablement	12356-2345-45-134
word charité		12356-2345
word charités		12356-2345-234
word chaud		12356-145
word chauds		12356-145-234
word chaude		12356-145-15
word chaudes		12356-145-156
word chaudement		12356-145-134
word chemin		12356-134
word chemins		12356-134-234
word chère		12356-2346
word chères		12356-2346-234
word chèrement		12356-2346-134
word chez		12356-1356
word chiffrage		12356-124-1245
word chiffrages		12356-124-1245-234
word chiffre		12356-124
word chiffres		12356-124-234
prfword chiffrement		12356-124-134
prfword chiffrements		12356-124-134-234
word choeur		12356-1235
word choeurs		12356-1235-234
word choix		12356-1346
word chose		12356-234
word choses		12356-234-234
word circonstance	14-25-14
word circonstances	14-25-14-234
word circonstanciel	14-25-14-123
word circonstanciels	14-25-14-123-234
word circonstancielle	14-25-14-123-123
word circonstancielles	14-25-14-123-123-234
word civil		14-1236
contraction cv	14-1236
word civils		14-1236-234
contraction cvs		14-1236-234
word civile		14-1236-15
word civiles		14-1236-156
word civilement		14-1236-134
word civilisation	14-1236-16
word civilisations	14-1236-16-234
word civilité		14-1236-2345
word civilités		14-1236-2345-234
word client	146-256-2345
word coeur		14-1235
word coeurs		14-1235-234
contraction crs	14-1235-234
word combien		14-12
contraction cb 14-12
word comme		14-134
contraction cm		14-134
word commencement	36-134
word commencements	36-134-234
word comment		14-26
word commentaire	14-26-1235
word commentaires	14-26-1235-234
word commentateur	14-26-46
word commentateurs	14-26-46-234
word commère	36-134-2346
word commères	13-134-2346-234
word commun		36-1345
word communs		36-1345-234
word commune		36-1345-15
word communes		36-1345-156
word communal		36-1345-123
word communale		36-1345-123-15
word communales		36-1345-123-156
word communautaire	36-1345-2345-1235
word communautaires	36-1345-2345-1235-234
word communauté		36-1345-2345
word communautés		36-1345-2345-234
word communaux		36-1345-1346
word communément	36-1345-134
word communion		36-1345-3456
word communions		36-1345-3456-234
word compère	36-1234-2346
word compères	36-1234-2346-234
word complément		36-1246-134
word compléments	36-1246-134-234
word complémentaire	36-1246-134-1235
word complémentaires	36-1246-134-1235-234
prfword complet		36-1246
prfword complets		36-1246-234
prfword complète		36-2345
prfword complètes		36-2345-234
prfword complètement	36-2345-134
word conclusion		25-14
word conclusions	25-14-234
word condition		25-145
word conditions		25-145-234
prfword conditionnel	25-145-123
prfword conditionnels	25-145-123-234
prfword conditionnelle	25-145-123-123
prfword conditionnelles	25-145-123-123-234
prfword conditionnellement	25-145-123-134
word confiance		25-124-14
word confiances		25-124-14-234
word confiant		25-124
word confiants		25-124-234
word confiante		25-124-15
word confiantes		25-124-156
word congrès		25-12456 <
prfword connaissance	25-1345-14
prfword connaissances	25-1345-14-234
prfword connaître		25-1345
prfword consciemment	25-234-134
prfword conscience		25-234-14
prfword consciences	25-234-14-234
word consciencieuse	25-234-14-234-15
word consciencieuses	25-234-14-234-156
word consciencieusement	25-234-14-234-134
word consciencieux	25-234-14-1346
prfword conscient		25-234
prfword conscients		25-234-234
prfword consciente		25-234-15
prfword conscientes	25-234-156
word conséquemment	14-12345-134
prfword conséquence	14-12345-14
prfword conséquences	14-12345-14-234
prfword conséquent		14-12345
prfword conséquents	14-12345-234
prfword conséquente	14-12345-15
prfword conséquentes	14-12345-156
word considérable	14-145
word considérables	14-145-234
contraction cd
word considérablement	14-145-134
contraction cds
word considération	14-145-16
word considérations	14-145-16-234
word contraire		14-356
word contraires		14-356-234
word contrairement	14-356-134
prfword contre	14-356
prfword contres	14-356-234
word conversation	25-1236
word conversations	25-1236-234
word côté		14-1456
word côtés		14-1456-234
word couple		14-1246
word couples		14-1246-234
word courage		14-1245
word courageuse		14-1245-234-15
word courageuses		14-1245-234-156
word courageusement	14-1245-234-134
word courageux		14-1245-1346

word danger		145-1245
word dangers		145-1245-234
word dangeureuse	145-1245-234-15
word dangeureuses	145-1245-234-156
word dangeureusement	145-1245-234-134
word dangeureux		145-1245-1346
word davantage		145-1
word debout		145-12
contraction db 145-12
word dedans		145-145
word défaut	145-123456-124-2345
word défauts	145-123456-124-2345-234
word degré		145-12456
word degrés		145-12456-234
word dehors		145-125
word déjà		145-245
prfword demain		145-134
prfword demains	145-134-234
word depuis		145-1234
word dernier		145-1345
word derniers		145-1345-234
word dernière		145-1235
word dernières		145-1235-234
word dernièrement	145-1235-134
word derrière		145-236
word derrières		145-236-234
word des		145-234
word désormais		145-34
word desquels		145-234-12345-123-234
word desquelles		145-234-12345-123-123-234
word destin		145-35
word destins		145-35-234
prfword destinataire	145-35-1235
prfword destinataires	145-35-1235-234
word destination	145-35-16
word destinations	145-35-16-234
word devant		145-1236
word devants		145-1236-234
prfword différemment	145-345-134
prfword différence		145-26-14
prfword différences	145-26-14-234
prfword différent		145-26
prfword différents		145-26-234
prfword différente		145-26-15
prfword différentes	145-26-156
word difficile		145-124
word difficiles		145-124-234
word difficilement	145-124-134
word difficulté		145-124-2345
word difficultés	145-124-2345-234
prfword digne		145-2356
prfword dignes		145-2356-234
prfword dignement		145-2356-134
word dignitaire		145-2356-2345-1235
word dignitaires	145-2356-2345-1235-234
prfword dignité		145-2356-2345
prfword dignités		145-2356-2345-234
word discours		256-14
word dispositif		256-1234-124
word dispositifs	256-1234-124-234
prfword disposition	256-1234
prfword dispositions	256-1234-234
word distance		256-2345-14
word distances		256-2345-14-234
word distant		256-2345
word distants		256-2345-234
word distante		256-2345-15
word distantes		256-2345-156
word donc		145-14
word dont		145-2345
word douleur		145-123
word douleurs		145-123-234
word douloureuse	145-123-234-15
word douloureuses	145-123-234-156
word douloureusement	145-123-234-134
word douloureux		145-123-1346
word doute		145-1256
word doutes		145-1256-234
word duquel		145-12345-123

prfword effectif		15-124-124
prfword effectifs		15-124-124-234
prfword effective		15-124-1236
prfword effectives		15-124-1236-234
word effectivement	15-124-1236-134
word effet		15-124
word effets		15-124-234
word égal		123456-1245
word égale		123456-1245-15
word égales		123456-1245-156
word également		123456-1245-134
word égalitaire		123456-1245-2345-1235
word égalitaires	123456-1245-2345-1235-234
word égalité		123456-1245-2345
word égalités		123456-1245-2345-234
word égaux		123456-1245-1346
word élément		123456-123
word éléments		123456-123-234
word élémentaire	123456-123-1235
word élémentaires	123456-123-1235-234
word encore		26-14
word endroit		26-145
word endroits		26-145-234
word énergie		123456-1345
word énergies		123456-1345-234
word énergique		123456-1345-12345
word énergiques		123456-1345-12345-234
word énergiquement	123456-1345-12345-134
word enfin		26-124
word ennui		26-1345
word ennuis		26-1345-234
word ennuyeuse		26-1345-234-15
word ennuyeuses		26-1345-234-156
word ennuyeux		26-1345-1346
word enquête		26-12345
word enquêtes		26-12345-234
word enquêteur		26-12345-46
word enquêteurs		26-12345-46-234
word enquêteuse		26-12345-234-15
word enquêteuses	26-12345-234-156
word ensemble		26-345
word ensembles		26-345-234
word ensuite		26-234
word entier		26-2345
word entiers		26-2345-234
word entière		26-1235
word entières		26-1235-234
word entièrement	26-1235-134
word environ		26-1236
word environs		26-1236-234
word espèce		156-1234
word espèces		156-1234-234
prfword espérance		156-1235-14
prfword espérances		156-1235-14-234
prfword espoir		156-1235
prfword espoirs		156-1235-234
word esprit		15-235
word esprits		15-235-234
word essentiel		156-123
word essentiels		156-123-234
word essentielle	156-123-123
word essentielles	156-123-123-234
word essentiellement	156-123-134
word étant		123456-2345
word être		126-356
word êtres		126-356-234
word événement		123456-1236
word événements		123456-1236-234
word éventualité	123456-1236-123-2345
word éventualités	123456-1236-123-2345-234
word éventuel		123456-1236-123
word éventuels		123456-1236-123-234
word éventuelle		123456-1236-123-123
word éventuelles	123456-1236-123-123-234
word éventuellement	123456-1236-123-134
word excellemment	1346-123-134
word excellence		1346-123-14
word excellences	1346-123-14-234
word excellent		1346-123
word excellents		1346-123-234
word excellente		1346-123-15
word excellentes	1346-123-156
word excès		1346-14
word excessif		1346-14-124
word excessifs		1346-14-124-234
word excessive		1346-14-1236
word excessives		1346-14-1236-234
word excessivement	1346-14-1236-134
word exercice		1346-236
word exercices		1346-236-234
prfword expérience		1346-1234
contraction xp	1346-1234
prfword expériences	1346-1234-234
word expérimental	1346-1234-123
word expérimentale	1346-1234-123-15
word expérimentales	1346-1234-123-156
word expérimentalement	1346-1234-123-134
word expérimentateur	1346-1234-46
word expérimentateurs	1346-1234-46-234
word expérimentation	1346-1234-16
word expérimentations	1346-1234-16-234
word expérimentaux	1346-1234-1346
prfword explicable		1346-1246-45
prfword explicables	1346-1246-45-234
word explicatif		1346-1246-124
word explicatifs	1346-1246-124-234
word explication	1346-1246
word explications	1346-1246-234
word explicative	1346-1246-1236
word explicatives	1346-1246-1236-234
prfword expressif		1346-235-124
prfword expressifs		1346-235-124-234
word expression		1346-235
word expressions	1346-235-234
prfword expressive		1346-235-1236
prfword expressives	1346-235-1236-234
prfword expressivement	1346-235-1236-134
prfword expressivité	1346-235-1236-2345
prfword expressivités	1346-235-1236-2345-234
word extérieur		1346-2345
word extérieurs		1346-2345-234
word extérieure		1346-2345-15
word extérieures	1346-2345-156
word extérieurement	1346-2345-134
word extrême		1346-356
word extrêmes		1346-356-234
word extrêmement	1346-356-134
word extrémité		1346-356-2345
word extrémités		1346-356-2345-234
